Massachusetts, session 194th, H3505.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 70 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- At least 14 days before 
digging or opening the ground pursuant to this section, the gas company shall provide written 
notice of the time and expected duration of the construction to owners of real estate abutting or 
within 100 feet of the location where the gas company is authorized to dig or open up the 
ground.  
SECTION 2. Section 20 of chapter 165 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by adding the following sentence:- At least 14 days before digging or opening the 
ground pursuant to this section, the corporation shall provide written notice of the time and 

of 2 10 expected duration of the construction to owners of real estate abutting or within 100 feet of the 
location where the corporation is authorized to dig or open up the ground. 
SECTION 3. The first paragraph of section 22 of chapter 166 of the General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- After receiving permission 
from the board of aldermen of a city or the board of selectmen of a town, but at least 14 days 
before erecting or constructing a transmission line pursuant to this paragraph, the company shall 
provide written notification of the time and expected duration of construction to owners of real 
estate abutting or within 100 feet of the location where the company is authorized to erect or 
construct such transmission line.